Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB404.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. The act of November 26, 1978 (P.L.1375, No.325), known as the Dam Safety and Encroachments Act, is amended by adding a section to read:Section 17.1. County conservation district stream reconstruction emergency permit authorizations.(a) A county conservation district with an approved delegation agreement in accordance with sections 6 and 17 and sections 9(11) and 11(2) of the act of May 15, 1945 (P.L.547, No.217), known as the "Conservation District Law," to administer certain activities under 25 Pa. Code Ch. 105 (relating to dam safety and waterway management), may request an amendment to the 123456789101112131415161718192021 approved delegation agreement for the Water Obstruction and Encroachment Program from the department for the purposes specified under this section.(b) As a county stream reconstruction program authorized by the department under this subsection, a county conservation district may propose methodologies for stream reconstruction activities in response to or in anticipation of significant flood events to restore the natural regimen and ecology of watercourses using appropriate methodologies that are based on current scientific principles and practices and are in accordance with 25 Pa. Code Ch. 105. The department shall review a proposed county stream reconstruction program under this subsection for conformance with current scientific principles and practices and 25 Pa. Code Ch. 105. The department shall provide a record of decision on the proposed county stream reconstruction program to the county conservation district, including a detailed technical review of the proposed county stream reconstruction program.(c) Upon approval of the county stream reconstruction program under subsection (b) by the department, the county conservation district may request an amendment to the county conservation district's approved delegation agreement for the Water Obstruction and Encroachment Program from the department which authorizes the county conservation district to issue emergency permits for stream reconstruction. The department may not unreasonably withhold the authorization of the amendment. The authority delegated under this subsection for the county conservation district to issue emergency permits shall only include emergency stream reconstruction in accordance with the approved county stream reconstruction program under subsection 20250SB0404PN0383 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (b), including activities which may prevent a flooding emergency event in the future.(d) The county conservation district may authorize stream reconstruction activities under an emergency permit in accordance with the approved county stream reconstruction program under subsection (b) and the final amended and approved delegation agreement for the Water Obstruction and Encroachment Program for the county.(e) The department shall develop a stream reconstruction emergency permit form for use in accordance with this section.(f) The department shall retain the duty to authorize emergency permits for all other waterway obstruction and encroachment activities under 25 Pa. Code Ch. 105 if conditions threaten public safety and the environment.(g) The department shall transmit a notice of each amendment to an approved delegation agreement under this section to the Legislative Reference Bureau for publication in the next available issue of the Pennsylvania Bulletin.(h) Notwithstanding any provision of the "Conservation District Law" or 2 Pa.C.S. Chs. 5 Subch. B (relating to practice and procedure of local agencies) and 7 Subch. B (relating to judicial review of local agency action), a person aggrieved by an action of a county conservation district under an approved delegation agreement which is amended under this section may appeal the action to the department within 30 days after notice of the action. A person aggrieved by an action of the department regarding the initial appeal under this subsection may appeal the action to the Environmental Hearing Board in accordance with section 24.(i) Within 60 days of the effective date of this section, 20250SB0404PN0383 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 the department shall provide notice to each county conservation district of the availability of a county stream reconstruction program under this section.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250SB0404PN0383 - 4 - 1234